Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3011
Podiatry; surgery; restrictions.

A podiatrist shall not perform surgery on the ankle other than in a licensed hospital or ambulatory surgical center, and a podiatrist who performs surgery on the ankle in a licensed hospital or ambulatory surgical center shall have successfully completed an advanced postdoctoral surgical residency program of at least one year's duration which is recognized as suitable for that purpose by the board.

No podiatrist initially licensed in this state on or after September 1, 2001, shall perform surgery on the ankle unless such person has successfully completed an advanced postdoctoral surgical residency program of at least two years' duration which is recognized as suitable for that purpose by the board.

Laws 2001, LB 25, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-174.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1033.